bulgarian.aff
flag *R:
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–¿“
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈… »
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈À»
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈À»“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈Ã
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈ÿ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈ÿ≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈Ÿ»
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–≈Ÿ»“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–»
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀ¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀŒ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂ’
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂ’¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂ’Ã≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂ’“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸ¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸŒ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,≈–ﬂŸŒ“Œ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À¿“¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À»
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À»“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À»ﬂ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿À»ﬂ“
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿ÀŒ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ¿“¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ»
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ»“≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ»ﬂ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿ÕŒ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿’
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿’¿
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿’Ã≈
    ≈ – ¿    >      -≈–¿,–¿’“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈… »
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈À»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÀŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ã
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’Ã≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈’“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÿ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ÿ≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ŸŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈…
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈…“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈Õ»
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈Õ»“≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,≈ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕ¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕ¿“¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ“
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕŒ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂÕŒ“Œ
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ≈ ﬂ      >      -≈ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À¿“¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À»
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À»“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À»ﬂ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿À»ﬂ“
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿ÀŒ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ¿“¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ»
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ»“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ»ﬂ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿ÕŒ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿’
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿’¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿’Ã≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,—¿’“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ¿“
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈… »
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À¿“¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À»
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À»“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À»ﬂ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈À»ﬂ“
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ÀŒ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ã
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈’
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈’¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈’Ã≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈’“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ÿ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ÿ≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ»
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ»“≈
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ŸŒ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ÿ ¿      >      -ÿ¿,ÿ»

flag *S:
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿…
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿… »
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿…“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À¿“¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À»
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À»“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À»ﬂ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿À»ﬂ“
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÀŒ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ã≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ¿“¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ»
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ»“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ»ﬂ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Õ»ﬂ“
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÕŒ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÕŒ“Œ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿“
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿’
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿’¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿’Ã≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿’“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÿ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ÿ≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ¿“¿
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ»
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ»“≈
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ»ﬂ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ŸŒ
    ¿ Ã      >      -¿Ã,¿ŸŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈… »
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈À»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈Õ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,≈ÿ≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»Ã
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,»ÿ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂÕŒ“Œ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’Ã≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂ’“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»“≈
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ
    ﬂ        >      -ﬂ,ﬂŸŒ“Œ
