bulgarian.dict
акумулирам/S
апретирам/S
баданосвам/S
безразсъдствувам/S
белея/R
беснея/R
бледнея/R
блокирам/S
богатея/R
бранувам/S
бъкам/S
българея/R
вглеждам/S
ветрея/R
вживея/R
взаимствам/S
вилнея/R
вкопчвам/S
вкочанея/R
влажнея/R
внушавам/S
вонея/R
връцкам/S
втривам/S
вцепенея/R
въвонея/R
възгласявам/S
възползвам/S
въртя/S
глобявам/S
говея/R
голея/R
гражданея/R
грознея/R
грохвам/S
гъстея/R
дебаркирам/S
декомпресирам/S
дера/R
деребействувам/S
дисимилирам/S
добера/R
довея/R
догневявам/S
додера/R
доживея/R
доизпиша/R
доизчаквам/S
домъчнея/R
донапълвам/S
дооздравея/R
допилея/R
допълзявам/S
доразбера/R
досъхвам/S
дотлея/R
драматизирам/S
дъртея/R
дюдюкам/S
елиминирам/S
ергенея/R
живея/R
живявам/S
забелея/R
заблея/R
заболея/R
заборчлея/R
забременявам/S
забърша/R
завиждам/S
завонея/R
загледам/S
загрея/R
загърмявам/S
задера/R
задърпам/S
зажаднея/R
зажълтея/R
заизмъквам/S
заклинвам/S
закопнея/R
закостенея/R
закупувам/S
закъснея/R
залинея/R
залитам/S
залюлея/R
замирам/S
замириша/R
замъждея/R
занемявам/S
запаша/R
запечатам/S
запилея/R
заповядам/S
заприклякам/S
запустея/R
запявам/S
зарозовея/R
заръфам/S
засинея/R
заслонявам/S
застарея/R
застъпвам/S
затлея/R
заточавам/S
затуптявам/S
затъмнея/R
затъпея/R
захлаждам/S
захубавея/R
зачерпвам/S
зачеша/R
заядам/S
зеленея/R
идвам/S
избеднея/R
избера/R
изблея/R
избутам/S
изветрея/R
извисявам/S
изгаснея/R
изгледам/S
изглупея/R
издекламирам/S
издера/R
издърпам/S
изжаднея/R
изкапвам/S
изкрадвам/S
изкуфея/R
излапам/S
изменявам/S
измириша/R
изнежвам/S
изнемощея/R
изпащам/S
изпилея/R
изплювам/S
изподера/R
изпонакъсвам/S
изпридам/S
изпълзявам/S
изреша/R
изроявам/S
изследвам/S
изсмея/R
изтиквам/S
изтрезнея/R
изтупвам/S
изумея/R
изхайманявам/S
изцеждам/S
изчеша/R
изщипвам/S
инициирам/S
ипотекирам/S
капвам/S
квалифицирам/S
киселея/R
клюкарствувам/S
комплицирам/S
контузвам/S
коравея/R
краставея/R
криввам/S
куцам/S
леденея/R
летувам/S
линея/R
лъжесвидетелствам/S
люлея/R
мародерствам/S
милея/R
министерствам/S
младея/R
момея/R
мумифицирам/S
мъдрея/R
мъждея/R
мършавея/R
мъчнея/R
набеснея/R
наблюдавам/S
навестявам/S
навлажнея/R
нагарчам/S
нагрея/R
нагрухвам/S
надделея/R
надера/R
надживея/R
надживявам/S
надпиша/R
надработвам/S
надъхвам/S
наедрея/R
назрея/R
наказвам/S
накокошинвам/S
накривея/R
налоквам/S
намалея/R
намразвам/S
напащам/S
напера/R
напомпам/S
напълнея/R
напътствувам/S
насапунисам/S
насмея/R
насмогвам/S
насявам/S
натежнея/R
натръсквам/S
нахокам/S
нашетам/S
немея/R
нивелирам/S
обединявам/S
обезпрашавам/S
обезумея/R
облагодетелствувам/S
облея/R
оборудвам/S
обтурирам/S
обърша/R
овехтея/R
овлажнея/R
оглавявам/S
оглупея/R
огрея/R
одрипавея/R
одумам/S
ожаднея/R
оздравея/R
озлобявам/S
окозвам/S
окраставея/R
окъснея/R
окьоравявам/S
олюлея/R
омаломощея/R
омъжвам/S
онемея/R
описвам/S
оплешивея/R
опосквам/S
опротивея/R
опържвам/S
оредея/R
освирепея/R
освирепявам/S
ослепея/R
основавам/S
остарея/R
отвеждам/S
отговея/R
отесам/S
отеснея/R
откършвам/S
отлея/R
отмилея/R
отпадам/S
отпера/R
отрезвея/R
отривам/S
оттласквам/S
отъпея/R
офейкам/S
оцелея/R
очушкам/S
ошугавея/R
парцелирам/S
пилея/R
писателствам/S
пламенея/R
плитам/S
побелея/R
побеснея/R
поблея/R
поборвам/S
повеселея/R
повря/S
погрея/R
погрижвам/S
подбера/R
подгрея/R
подгрявам/S
подкупвам/S
подлудея/R
подосещам/S
подпаша/R
подразбера/R
подритвам/S
подсушавам/S
поевтинея/R
поетизирам/S
пожълтея/R
позабогатея/R
позагрея/R
позаинтересувам/S
позакоравея/R
позапиша/R
позастарея/R
позасъхвам/S
поизбелея/R
поизгладнея/R
поизказвам/S
поизпера/R
поизстивам/S
поизтънея/R
поклякам/S
полирам/S
полудея/R
помамвам/S
помириша/R
помътнея/R
понабутам/S
понагрея/R
понаедрея/R
понакиселея/R
понакичвам/S
понамириша/R
понапълнея/R
понапъпвам/S
понясам/S
поогладнея/R
пооголея/R
пооживея/R
поокуражавам/S
поопаша/R
поопиша/R
поослушвам/S
поостарея/R
поотмалея/R
поотраквам/S
поохладнея/R
попоглеждам/S
попрепиша/R
попритайвам/S
поразговорвам/S
поразтърсвам/S
поруменея/R
посвещавам/S
посивея/R
поскъпнея/R
последвам/S
посребрея/R
пострадам/S
потретвам/S
потъмнея/R
поумълчавам/S
почвам/S
почервенея/R
почеша/R
пощурея/R
правораздавам/S
пребърша/R
превалявам/S
преграбчвам/S
прегрея/R
предотвратявам/S
прежалвам/S
прежъднея/R
преизбера/R
прекатервам/S
прелъстявам/S
пренасочвам/S
препаша/R
препятствам/S
престарея/R
претворявам/S
приближавам/S
пригрея/R
приклаждам/S
примокрея/R
приплескам/S
притъквам/S
причернея/R
прогизвам/S
продера/R
прокънтявам/S
пропиша/R
проследявам/S
прояснявам/S
пълнея/R
разбеснея/R
разбойничествам/S
развиделея/R
разгодявам/S
разгрея/R
разквасвам/S
разлюлея/R
размитквам/S
разпиша/R
разприказвам/S
разсявам/S
разходвам/S
разхубавея/R
регенерирам/S
розовея/R
ръгвам/S
ръждавея/R
самоусъвършенствам/S
свършвам/S
сгрея/R
скалъпявам/S
слабея/R
сливам/S
сопвам/S
спиша/R
спрягам/S
старея/R
стресирам/S
счуквам/S
съдера/R
съсипвам/S
тежнея/R
травматизирам/S
тъмнея/R
убеждавам/S
уйдисвам/S
умалея/R
уравновесявам/S
утежнея/R
учителствам/S
хакам/S
хубавея/R
цамбурвам/S
чифтосвам/S
чуждея/R
щампосвам/S
щръклея/R
